Tennessee, session 114, HB1357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-2-411(a), is amended by deleting
"Each year" and substituting "By March 1 of each year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1357
003351
- 1 -